test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex_toohad_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests: 

  Verb - toohâđ: # MLO, checked
    toohâđ+V+Inf: toohâđ
    toohâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: toovâm
    toohâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: toovah
    toohâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: taha
    toohâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: tahheen
    toohâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: tohâvettee
    toohâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: toohâv
    toohâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: toohâp
    toohâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: tohâvetteđ
    toohâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: taheh
    toohâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: toohim
    toohâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: toohih
    toohâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: toovâi
    toohâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: tovváim
    toohâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: tovváid
    toohâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: tovváin
    toohâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: toovâim
    toohâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: toovâid
    toohâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: tohhii
    toohâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: tovâččim
    toohâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: tovâččih
    toohâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: tovâččij
    toohâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: tovâččáim
    toohâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: tovâččáid
    toohâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: tovâččáin
    toohâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: tovâččijm
    toohâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: tovâččijd
    toohâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: tovâččii
    toohâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: tahheem
    toohâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: tahheeh
    toohâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: toovâš
    toohâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: tovâžeen
    toohâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: toovâšvettee
    toohâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: tovâžává
    toohâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: tovâžep
    toohâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: toovâšvetteđ
    toohâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: tovâžeh
    toohâđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: toovâ
    toohâđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: tavos
    toohâđ+V+Imprt+Du1: tahhoon
    toohâđ+V+Imprt+Du2: tahhee
    toohâđ+V+Imprt+Du3: tahhoos
    toohâđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: tahhoop
    toohâđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: toohâđ
    toohâđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: tahhoos
    toohâđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: toovâ
    toohâđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: toohâm
    toohâđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: tovâččii
    toohâđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: toovii
    toohâđ+V+PrsPrc: tahhee
    toohâđ+V+PrfPrc: toohâm
    toohâđ+V+Actio+Nom: toohâm
    toohâđ+V+Actio+Ess: tohâmin
    toohâđ+V+Actio+Loc: tohâmist
    toohâđ+V+Actio+Ill: tohâmân
    toohâđ+V+Actio+Com: tovâdijn
    toohâđ+V+VAbess: tovâhánnáá

  Verb - luuhâđ: # MLO checked
    luuhâđ+V+Inf: luuhâđ
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: luuvâm
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: luuvah
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lohá
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: lohheen
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: luhâvettee
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: luuhâv
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: luuhâp
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: luhâvetteđ
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: loheh
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: luuhim
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: luuhih
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: luuvâi
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: luvváim
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: luvváid
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: luvváin
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: luuvâim
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: luuvâid
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: luhhii
    luuhâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: luvâččim
    luuhâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: luvâččih
    luuhâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: luvâččij
    luuhâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: luvâččáim
    luuhâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: luvâččáid
    luuhâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: luvâččáin
    luuhâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: luvâččijm
    luuhâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: luvâččijd
    luuhâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: luvâččii
    luuhâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: lohheem
    luuhâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: lohheeh
    luuhâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: luuvâš
    luuhâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: luvâžeen
    luuhâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: luuvâšvettee
    luuhâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: luvâžává
    luuhâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: luvâžep
    luuhâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: luuvâšvetteđ
    luuhâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: luvâžeh
    luuhâđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: luuvâ
    luuhâđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: lovos
    luuhâđ+V+Imprt+Du1: lohhoon
    luuhâđ+V+Imprt+Du2: lohhee
    luuhâđ+V+Imprt+Du3: lohhoos
    luuhâđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: lohhoop
    luuhâđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: luuhâđ
    luuhâđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: lohhoos
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: luuvâ
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: luuhâm
    luuhâđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: luvâččii
    luuhâđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: luuvii
    luuhâđ+V+PrsPrc: lohhee
    luuhâđ+V+PrfPrc: luuhâm
    luuhâđ+V+Actio+Nom: luuhâm
    luuhâđ+V+Actio+Ess: luhâmin
    luuhâđ+V+Actio+Loc: luhâmist
    luuhâđ+V+Actio+Ill: luhâmân
    luuhâđ+V+Actio+Com: luvâdijn
    luuhâđ+V+VAbess: luvâhánnáá

  Verb - juuhâđ: #
    juuhâđ+V+Inf: juuhâđ
    juuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: juuvâm
    juuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: juhá
    juuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: juheh
    juuhâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: juuhim
    juuhâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: juvváid
